California, session 20252026, AB1722.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. (a) The Legislature finds and declares that the federal Endangered Species Act of 1973 (16 U.S.C. Sec. 1531 et seq.) establishes a defense against the imposition of civil penalties, and a defense to prosecution, for the take of an animal listed pursuant to the federal act if the defendant committed the act based on a good faith belief that they were acting to protect themselves, a member of their family, or any other individual from that animal (16 U.S.C. Sec. 1540).(b) It is the intent of the Legislature to establish similar defenses against the imposition of civil and criminal penalties for the take of an animal listed pursuant to the California Endangered Species Act (Chapter 1.5 (commencing with Section 2050) of Division 3 of the Fish and Game Code) for when that take is necessary and reasonable to the threat an animal listed under the California Endangered Species Act may pose to a human.SEC. 2. Section 2080.8 is added to the Fish and Game Code, to read:2080.8. (a) A civil or administrative penalty shall not be imposed for a violation of Section 2080 or 2085, or both, if it can be shown by a preponderance of the evidence that the defendant used necessary and reasonable force to protect themselves, a member of their family, or any other individual from immediate bodily harm from any endangered, threatened, or candidate species.(b) It shall be a defense to prosecution for a violation of Section 2080 or 2085, or both, if the defendant used necessary and reasonable force to protect themselves, a member of their family, or any other individual from immediate bodily harm from any endangered, threatened, or candidate species.(c) A person who committed a take, or an attempted take, described in this section shall notify the department within 24 hours after the take.(d) (1) On or before July 1, 2032, the department shall prepare a report that includes, but is not limited to, compiled data, including the species, date, and approximate location, regarding a take of an animal reported pursuant to subdivision (c) between January 1, 2027, through December 31, 2031.(2) The report prepared pursuant to this subdivision shall be submitted to the relevant legislative policy and budget committees in both houses of the Legislature and be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.SEC. 3. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because the only costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.